California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(h) Water supply charges are water supply property when, and to the extent that, a financing order authorizing the water supply charges has become effective in accordance with this article, and the water supply property shall thereafter continuously exist as property for all purposes with all of the rights and privileges of this article for the period and to the extent provided in the financing order, but in any event until the water rate relief bonds, including all principal, premium, if any, and interest with respect to the bonds and all other financing costs are paid in full. A financing order may
 provide that the creation of water supply property shall be simultaneous with the sale of the water supply property to a transferee or assignee as provided in the application and the pledge of the water supply property to secure water rate relief bonds.

(i) Any surplus water supply charges in excess of the necessary amounts to pay the principal premium, if any, and interest on the water rate relief bonds and all other financing costs shall be credited to customers through the adjustment mechanism described in subdivision (g) or used to prepay or defease water rate relief bonds, so long as this would not result in a recharacterization of the tax, accounting, and other intended characteristics of the financing, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Avoiding the recognition
 of debt on the qualifying water utility’s balance sheet for financial accounting and regulatory purposes.

(2) Treating the water rate relief bonds as debt of the qualifying water utility or its affiliates for federal income tax purposes.

(3) Treating the transfer of the water supply property by the qualifying water utility as a true sale for bankruptcy purposes.

(4) Avoiding any adverse impact of the financing on the qualifying water utility’s credit rating.

(j) The commission 
 shall, pursuant to its authority in Section 739.8, implement a program to exclude low-income water ratepayers participating in commission-approved, low-income rate assistance programs from the payment of any water supply charge imposed pursuant to this section, if it determines that the exclusion from the charge will have no significant impact on the ability of the financing entity to finance the water supply activity. The commission may also allow the adjustment of the amount of the charge, as necessary, to cover any costs associated with implementation of the
 exclusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

849.2.

(a) A qualifying water utility for which a financing order has been issued shall cause the proceeds of any water rate relief bonds issued pursuant to a financing order to be placed in a separate account. A qualifying water utility may use the proceeds of the issuance of water rate relief bonds for paying water supply costs and financing costs and for no other purpose.

(b) A financing order may require the qualifying utility to file with the commission a periodic report showing the receipt and disbursement of proceeds of water rate relief bonds. A financing order may authorize the staff of the commission to review and audit the books and records of the qualifying water
 utility relating to the receipt and disbursement of proceeds of water rate relief bonds. The provisions of this subdivision shall not be construed to limit the authority of the commission to investigate the practices of the qualifying utility or to audit the books and records of the qualifying water utility.

(c) A qualifying water utility for which a financing order has been issued shall annually provide to its customers a concise explanation of the water supply charges approved in a financing order, as modified by subsequent issuances of water rate relief bonds authorized under a financing order, if any, and by application of the true-up adjustment mechanism as provided in the financing order. These explanations shall be made after the annual true-up adjustment pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 849.1 and prior to, or simultaneous
 with, the effective date of the adjustment, and may be made by bill inserts, Internet Web site information, or other appropriate means. If water rate relief bonds are issued by a public
 financing entity, the public financing entity, or its trustee or representative, shall provide the information to the qualifying water utility as reasonably requested in order to comply with its obligations under this section.

(d) The failure of a qualifying water utility to apply the proceeds of water rate relief bonds in a reasonable, prudent, and appropriate manner or otherwise comply with any provision of this section shall not invalidate, impair, or affect any financing order, water supply property, water supply charges, or water rate relief bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

849.3.

(a) Financing entities may issue water rate relief bonds upon approval by the commission in the financing order. Water rate relief bonds shall be nonrecourse to the credit or any assets of the qualifying water utility, other than the water supply property as specified in the financing order.

(b) A qualifying water utility may sell and assign all or portions of its interest in water supply property to an affiliate. A qualifying water utility or its affiliates may sell or assign their interests to one or more financing entities authorized under this article that make that property the basis for issuance of water rate relief bonds to the extent approved in the financing
 order. A qualifying water utility, its affiliates, or financing entities may pledge and assign water supply property as collateral, directly or indirectly, to the extent approved in the financing order providing for a security interest in the water supply property, in the manner set forth in Section 849.4. In addition, water supply property may be sold or assigned by either of the following:

(1) The financing entity or a trustee for the holders of water rate relief bonds or the holder of an ancillary agreement in connection with the exercise of remedies upon a default.

(2) A person acquiring the water supply property after a sale or assignment made pursuant to this article.

(c) To the extent that any interest in water
 supply property is sold, assigned, or pledged as collateral, the commission shall authorize the qualifying water utility to contract with the financing entity or entities that it will continue to operate its system to provide service to its customers, will collect water supply charges for the benefit and account of the financing entities and their pledgees, and will account for and remit these amounts to or for the account of the financing entities and their pledgees. Contracting with a financing entity in accordance with that authorization shall not impair or negate the characterization of the sale, assignment, or pledge as an absolute transfer, a true sale, or security interest, as applicable.

(d) Water supply property that is specified in a financing order shall constitute an existing, present property right, notwithstanding the
 fact that the imposition and collection of water supply charges depend on the qualifying water utility continuing to provide water service or continuing to perform its servicing functions relating to the collection of water supply charges or on the level of future water consumption. Water supply property shall exist whether or not the water supply charges have been billed, have accrued, or have been collected and notwithstanding the fact that the value for a security interest in the water supply property, or amount of the water supply property, is dependent on the future provision of service to customers by the qualifying water utility. All water supply property specified in a financing order shall continue to exist until the water supply bonds issued pursuant to a financing order and all other financing costs are paid in full.

(e) If a
 qualifying water utility defaults on any required payment of water supply charge revenues, a court, upon application by an interested party and without limiting any other remedies available to the applying party, shall order the sequestration and payment of the water supply charges, and the proceeds of the water supply charges, for the benefit of bondholders, any assignee and financing entities or their pledgees, and the counterparties to any ancillary agreement. The order shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceedings with respect to the qualifying water utility or any affiliate of the qualifying water utility.

(f) Water supply property, water supply charges, and the interests of an assignee, bondholder or financing entity, or any pledgee in water supply property and water
 supply charges are not subject to setoff, counterclaim, surcharge, or defense by the qualifying utility or any other person or in connection with the bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding of the qualifying water utility, any affiliate of the qualifying water utility, or any other entity.

(g) Notwithstanding Section 1708 or any other provision of law, any requirement under this article, or a financing order, that the commission take action with respect to the subject matter of a financing order, shall be binding upon the commission, as it may be constituted from time to time, and any successor agency exerting functions similar to the commission. The commission shall not have authority to rescind, alter, or amend that requirement in a financing order. The approval by the commission in a financing order of the
 issuance by the qualifying water utility or a financing entity of water rate relief bonds shall include the approvals, if any, required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 816) and Section 701.5. Section 701.5 shall not be construed to prohibit the issuance of water rate relief bonds upon the terms and conditions approved by the commission in a financing order. Section 851 is not applicable to the transfer or pledge of water supply property, the issuance of water rate relief bonds, or related transactions approved in a financing order.

(h) A financing entity issuing water rate relief bonds shall include in its preliminary notice and final report for the water rate relief bonds submitted to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission pursuant to Section 8855 of the Government Code, a statement that the water rate relief bonds are
 being issued pursuant to this section. A financing entity issuing water rate relief bonds shall include in its final report for the water rate relief bonds submitted to the California Debt and Investment Advisory Commission pursuant to Section 8855 of the Government Code, the savings realized by issuing the water rate relief bonds rather than using traditional utility financing mechanisms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

849.4.

(a) A security interest in water supply property is valid, is enforceable against the pledgor and third parties, is subject to the rights of any third party holding a security interest in the water supply property perfected in the manner described in this section, and attaches when all of the following occur:

(1) The commission has issued the financing order authorizing the water supply charges included in the water supply property.

(2) Value has been given by the pledgees of the water supply property.

(3) The pledgor has signed a security agreement that
 includes an indenture or financing agreement relating to the issuance of the water rater relief bonds covering the water supply property.

(b) A valid and enforceable security interest in water supply property is perfected when it has attached and when a financing statement has been filed in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code, naming the pledgor of the water supply property as “debtor” and identifying the water supply property. Any description of the water supply property shall be sufficient if it refers to the financing order creating the water supply property. A copy of the financing statement shall be filed with the commission by the qualifying water utility that is the pledgor or transferor of the water supply property, and the commission may require the qualifying water utility
 to make other filings with respect to the security interest in accordance with procedures it may establish, provided that the filings do not affect the perfection of the security interest.

(c) A perfected security interest in water supply property is a continuously perfected security interest in all revenues and proceeds arising with respect to the water supply property, whether or not the revenues or proceeds have accrued. Conflicting security interests shall rank according to priority in time of perfection. Water supply property shall constitute property for all purposes, including for contracts securing water rate relief bonds, whether or not the revenues and proceeds arising with respect to the water supply property have accrued.

(d) Subject to the terms of the security agreement
 covering the water supply property and the rights of any third party holding a security interest in the water supply property perfected in the manner described in this section, the validity and relative priority of a security interest created under this section is not defeated or adversely affected by the commingling of revenues arising with respect to the water supply property with other funds of the qualifying water utility that is the pledgor or transferor of the water supply property, or by any security interest in a deposit account of that qualifying water utility perfected under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code into which the revenues are deposited. Subject to the terms of the security agreement, upon compliance with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 9312 of the Commercial Code, the pledgees of the water supply property shall have a perfected security
 interest in all cash and deposit accounts of the qualifying water utility in which revenues arising with respect to the water supply property have been commingled with other funds, but the perfected security interest shall be limited to an amount not greater than the amount of the revenues with respect to the water supply property received by the qualifying water utility within 12 months before either of the following:

(1) A default under the security agreement.

(2) The institution of insolvency proceedings by or against the qualifying water utility, less payments from the revenues to the pledgees during that 12-month period.

(e) If a default occurs under the security agreement covering the water supply property, the
 pledgees of the water supply property, subject to the terms of the security agreement, shall have all rights and remedies of a secured party upon default under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, and shall be entitled to foreclose or otherwise enforce their security interest in the water supply property, subject to the rights of any third party holding a prior security interest in the water supply property perfected in the manner provided in this section. In addition, the commission may require, in the financing order creating the water supply property, that in the event of default by the qualifying water utility in payment of revenues arising with respect to the water supply property, the commission and any successor to the commission, upon the application by the pledgees or transferees, including transferees under Section 849.5, of the water supply property, and
 without limiting any other remedies available to the pledgees or transferees by reason of the default, shall order the sequestration and payment to the pledgees or transferees of revenues arising with respect to the water supply property. Any order shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceedings with respect to the debtor, pledgor, or transferor of the water supply property. Any surplus in excess of amounts necessary to pay principal, premium, if any, interest on the water rate relief bonds, and other financing costs arising under the security agreement, shall be remitted to the debtor or to the pledgor or transferor.

(f) Sections 9204 and 9205 of the Commercial Code shall apply to a pledge of water supply property by a qualifying water utility, an affiliate of a
 qualifying water utility, or a financing entity, other than a public financing entity.

(g) (1) This section sets forth the terms by which a consensual security interest shall be created and perfected in the water supply property. Unless otherwise ordered by the commission with respect to any series of water rate relief bonds on or before the issuance of the series, there shall exist a statutory lien as provided in this subdivision.

(2) Upon the effective date of the financing order, there shall exist a first priority lien on all water supply property then existing or thereafter arising pursuant to the terms of the financing order. This lien shall automatically arise pursuant to this section without any action on the part of the qualifying water utility, any
 affiliate of the qualifying water utility, the issuing entity, or any other person. This lien shall secure all obligations, then existing and subsequently arising, to the holders of the water rate relief bonds issued pursuant to the financing order, the trustee or representative for the holders, and any other entity specified in the financing order. The persons for whose benefit this lien is established shall, upon occurrence of any defaults specified in the financing order, have all rights and remedies of a secured party upon default under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 9101) of Division 9 of the
 Commercial Code, and shall be entitled to foreclose or otherwise enforce this statutory lien in the water supply property. This lien shall attach to the water supply property regardless of who shall own, or shall subsequently be determined to own, the water supply property, including any qualifying water utility, affiliate of the qualifying water utility, financing entity, or any other person. This lien shall be valid, perfected, and enforceable against the owner of the water supply property and all third parties upon the effectiveness of the financing order without any further public notice, provided, however, that any person may, but shall not be required to, file a financing statement in accordance with subdivision (b). These financing statements may be protective filings and shall not be evidence of the ownership of the water supply property.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Section 5451 of the Government Code shall apply to any pledge by the public financing entity of water supply property or other security for any water rate relief bonds issued by a public financing entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

849.5.

(a) A sale, assignment, or transfer of water supply property by a qualifying water utility to an affiliate or to a financing entity, or by an affiliate of a qualifying water utility or a financing entity to another financing entity, which the parties, in the governing documentation, have expressly stated to be a sale or other absolute transfer, in a transaction approved in a financing order, shall be treated as an absolute transfer of all of the transferor’s right, title, and interest, as in a true sale, and not as a pledge or other financing order of the water supply property, other than for federal and state income and franchise tax purposes.

(b) The characterization
 of the sale, assignment, or transfer as an absolute transfer and true sale and the corresponding characterization of the property interest of the purchaser shall not be affected or impaired by, among other things, the occurrence of any of the following:

(1) Commingling of water supply charge revenues with other amounts.

(2) The retention by the seller of either of the following:

(A) A partial or residual interest, including an equity interest, in the water supply property, whether direct or indirect, subordinate or otherwise.

(B) The right to recover costs associated with taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on the collection of water supply charge
 revenues.

(3) Any recourse that the purchaser may have against the seller.

(4) Any indemnification rights, obligations, or repurchase rights made or provided by the seller.

(5) The obligation of the seller to collect water supply charge revenues on behalf of an assignee.

(6) The treatment of the sale, assignment, or transfer for tax, financial reporting, or other purposes.

(7) Any true-up adjustment of the water supply charges as provided in the financing order.

(c) A sale, assignment, or transfer of water supply property shall be deemed
 perfected against third persons when both of the following occur:

(1) The commission issues the financing order authorizing the water supply charges included in the water supply property.

(2) An assignment of the water supply property in writing has been executed and delivered to the transferee.

(d) As between bona fide assignees of the same right for value without notice, the assignee first filing a financing statement in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code naming the assignor of the water supply property as debtor and identifying the water supply property has priority. Any description of the water supply property shall be sufficient if it refers to the financing
 order creating the water supply property. A copy of the financing statement shall be filed by the assignee with the commission, and the commission may require the assignor or the assignee to make other filings with respect to the transfer in accordance with procedures it may establish, but these filings shall not affect the perfection of the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

849.6.

A successor to the qualified water utility, whether pursuant to bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding, or pursuant to merger, sale, or transfer, by operation of law, or otherwise, shall perform and satisfy all obligations of the qualifying water utility pursuant to this article in the same manner and to the same extent as the qualified water utility, including, but not limited to, collecting and paying to the holders of water rate relief bonds or any financing entities or their pledgees revenues arising with respect to the water supply property sold to the applicable financing entity or pledged to secure water rate relief bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 482, Sec. 6.   (SB 936)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.8. Catastrophic Wildfire and Ratepayer Protection Financing [850. - 850.8.]

850.

(a) This article applies in any of the following circumstances:

(1) If an electrical corporation applies to the commission for recovery of costs and expenses related to a catastrophic wildfire and the commission finds some or all of the costs and expenses to be reasonable pursuant to Section 451.1, or for the amount of costs and expenses determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 451.2, then the electrical corporation may file an application requesting the commission to issue a financing order to authorize these costs and expenses to be recovered through fixed recovery charges pursuant to this article.

(2) If an electrical corporation submits an application for recovery of costs and expenses
 related to catastrophic wildfires, including fire risk mitigation capital expenditures identified in subdivision (e) of Section 8386.3 or subdivision (a) of Section 8386.10, in a proceeding to recover costs and expenses in rates and the commission finds that some or all of the costs and expenses identified in the electrical corporation’s application are just and reasonable pursuant to Section 451, the electrical corporation may file an application requesting the commission to issue a financing order to authorize the recovery of those just and reasonable costs and expenses by means of a financing order, with those costs and expenses being recovered through a fixed charge pursuant to this article. This paragraph does not apply for costs and expenses incurred by the electrical corporation after December 31,
 2035.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), for a catastrophic wildfire that was ignited between January 1, 2025, and the effective date of this paragraph, if a large electrical corporation has settled or finally adjudicated claims and the Wildfire Fund assets are exhausted, the electrical corporation, before filing an application for a just and reasonable determination pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, may file an application requesting the commission to issue a financing order to authorize the costs and expenses of those settled and finally adjudicated claims that cannot be paid by the Wildfire Fund to be recovered through fixed recovery charges pursuant to this article. For purposes of this paragraph, “large electrical corporation” and “Wildfire Fund assets” have the same meanings as set forth in Section 3280.

(4) (A) An electrical corporation may file an application requesting the commission to issue a financing order to authorize the recovery of verified incremental undercollection amounts for calendar year 2020 through fixed recovery charges pursuant to this article, if an electrical corporation’s annual true-up advice letter is accepted and either or both of the following incremental undercollection amounts are verified for calendar year 2020:

(i) An incremental undercollection amount equal to the difference between the forecasted amount of billed revenues for that year, based on the authorized sales forecast, and the revenues actually billed by an electrical corporation with respect to all revenue balancing accounts, if the incremental amount as a percent
 of the forecasted amount of billed revenues for that year is at least 5 percent.

(ii) An incremental undercollection amount equal to the residential and small business customer bad debt expense recorded for that year that exceeds the bad debt expense for that year that was adopted by the commission in the general rate case, if the incremental undercollection amount is otherwise eligible for recovery in rates.

(B) The incremental undercollection amounts subject to a commission-approved financing order shall be prohibited from being recovered through any other cost recovery application, mechanism, or request by the electrical corporation.

(C) The commission shall ensure any costs included in incremental undercollections described in this paragraph and subject to a financing order are just and reasonable consistent with
 the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 850.1.

(D) In resolving a request for the issuance of a financing order, the commission may assign cost recovery to each customer class based on their contribution to the incremental undercollection described in this paragraph.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Ancillary agreement” means a bond insurance policy, letter of credit, reserve account, surety bond, swap arrangement, hedging arrangement, liquidity or credit support arrangement, or other similar agreement or arrangement entered into in connection with the issuance of recovery bonds that is designed to promote the credit quality and marketability of the bonds or to
 mitigate the risk of an increase in interest rates.

(2) “Catastrophic wildfire amounts” means the portion of costs and expenses the commission finds to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 451.1 or the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 451.2.

(3) “Consumer” means any individual, governmental body, trust, business entity, or nonprofit organization that consumes electricity that has been transmitted or distributed by means of electrical transmission or distribution facilities, whether those
 electrical transmission or distribution facilities are owned by the consumer, the electrical corporation, or any other party.

(4) “Financing costs” means the costs to issue, service, repay, or refinance recovery bonds, whether incurred or paid upon issuance of the recovery bonds or over the life of the recovery bonds, if they are approved for recovery by the commission in a financing order. “Financing costs” may include any of the following:

(A) Principal, interest, and redemption premiums that are payable on recovery bonds.

(B) A payment required under an ancillary agreement.

(C) An amount required to fund or replenish reserve accounts or other accounts established under an indenture, ancillary agreement, or other
 financing document relating to the recovery bonds.

(D) Taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on fixed recovery charges.

(E) Costs related to issuing and servicing recovery bonds or the application for a financing order, including, without limitation, servicing fees and expenses, trustee fees and expenses, legal fees and expenses, accounting fees, administrative fees, underwriting and placement fees, financial advisory fees, original issue discount, capitalized interest, rating agency fees, and any other related costs that are approved for recovery in the financing order.

(F) Other costs as specifically authorized by a financing order.

(5) “Financing entity” means the electrical corporation or any subsidiary or affiliate of the electrical
 corporation that is authorized by the commission to issue recovery bonds or acquire recovery property, or both.

(6) “Financing order” means an order of the commission adopted in accordance with this article, which shall include, without limitation, a procedure to require the expeditious approval by the commission of periodic adjustments to fixed recovery charges and to any associated fixed recovery tax amounts included in that financing order to ensure recovery of all recovery costs and the costs associated with the proposed recovery, financing, or refinancing thereof, including the costs of servicing and retiring the recovery bonds contemplated by the financing order.

(7) “Fixed recovery charges” means those nonbypassable rates and other charges, including, but not limited to, distribution, connection, disconnection, and termination rates and charges, that are authorized by the
 commission in a financing order to recover both of the following:

(A) Recovery costs specified in the financing order.

(B) The costs of recovering, financing, or refinancing those recovery costs through a plan approved by the commission in the financing order, including the costs of servicing and retiring recovery bonds.

(8) “Fixed recovery tax amounts” means those nonbypassable rates and other charges, including, but not limited to, distribution, connection, disconnection, and termination rates and charges, that are needed to recover federal and State of California income and franchise taxes associated with fixed recovery charges authorized by the commission in a financing order, but are not approved as financing costs financed from proceeds of recovery bonds.

(9) “Recovery bonds” means bonds, notes, certificates of participation or beneficial interest, or other evidences of indebtedness or ownership, issued pursuant to an executed indenture or other agreement of a financing entity, the proceeds of which are used, directly or indirectly, to recover, finance, or refinance recovery costs, and that are directly or indirectly secured by, or payable from, recovery property.

(10) “Recovery costs” means any of the following:

(A) The catastrophic wildfire amounts or costs pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) authorized by the commission in a financing order for recovery.

(B) The incremental undercollection amounts that the commission authorizes for recovery in a financing order pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(C) Federal and State of California income and franchise taxes associated with recovery of the amounts pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B).

(D) Financing costs.

(E) Professional fees, consultant fees, redemption premiums, tender premiums, and other costs incurred by the electrical corporation in using proceeds of recovery bonds to acquire outstanding securities of the electrical corporation, as authorized by the commission in a financing order.

(11) (A) “Recovery property” means the property right created pursuant to this article, including, without limitation, the right, title, and interest of the electrical corporation or its transferee:

(i) In and to the fixed
 recovery charges established pursuant to a financing order, including all rights to obtain adjustments to the fixed recovery charges in accordance with Section 850.1 and the financing order.

(ii) To be paid the amount that is determined in a financing order to be the amount that the electrical corporation or its transferee is lawfully entitled to receive pursuant to the provisions of this article and the proceeds thereof, and in and to all revenues, collections, claims, payments, moneys, or proceeds of or arising from the fixed recovery charges that are the subject of a financing order.

(B) “Recovery property” shall not include a right to be paid fixed recovery tax amounts.

(C) “Recovery property” shall constitute a current property right, notwithstanding the fact that the value of the property right will depend on
 consumers using electricity or, in those instances where consumers are customers of the electrical corporation, the electrical corporation performing certain services.

(12) (A) “Revenue balancing account” means a balancing account reflecting the balance between the electrical corporation’s authorized revenue requirements relating to the volumetric sale of electricity and billed revenues associated with those sales. A revenue balancing account includes accounts reflecting the balance between the electrical corporation’s authorized distribution base revenue requirements and recorded billed revenues from authorized distribution rates, and accounts reflecting the difference between the amount of the discount provided to consumers enrolled in the California Alternative Rates for Energy
 (CARE) program and the CARE surcharge charged to non-CARE consumers.

(B) “Revenue balancing account” shall not include amounts reflecting the balance between costs and expenses relating to fuel and purchased electricity by the electrical corporation.

(13) “Service territory” means the geographical area that the electrical corporation provides with electrical distribution service.

(14) “True-up adjustment” means a formulaic adjustment to the fixed recovery charges as they appear on customer bills that is necessary to correct for any overcollection or undercollection of the fixed
 recovery charges authorized by a financing order and to otherwise ensure the timely and complete payment and recovery of recovery costs over the authorized repayment term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 33.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

850.1.

(a) If an electrical corporation files for recovery of recovery costs and the commission finds some or all of those costs and expenses to be just and reasonable pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, as applicable, or the commission allocates to the ratepayers some or all of those costs and expenses pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 451.2, the commission may issue a financing order to allow recovery through fixed recovery charges, which would therefore constitute recovery property under this article, and order that any portion of the electrical corporation’s federal and State of California income and franchise taxes associated with those fixed recovery charges and not financed from proceeds of recovery bonds may be recovered through fixed recovery tax amounts.

(1) (A) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), following application by an electrical corporation, the commission shall issue a financing order if the commission determines that both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(I) The recovery cost to be reimbursed from the recovery bonds have been found to be
 just and reasonable pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, as applicable, or are allocated to the ratepayers pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 451.2.

(II) The issuance of the recovery bonds, including all material terms and conditions of the recovery bonds, including, without limitation, interest rates, rating, amortization redemption, and maturity, and the imposition and collection of fixed recovery charges as set forth in an application satisfy all of the following conditions, as applicable:

(ia) They are just and reasonable.

(ib) They are consistent with the public interest.

(ic) The recovery of recovery costs through the designation of the fixed
 recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts, and the issuance of recovery bonds in connection with the fixed recovery charges, would reduce, to the maximum extent possible, the rates on a present value basis that consumers within the electrical corporation’s service territory would pay as compared to the use of traditional utility financing mechanisms, which shall be calculated using the electrical corporation’s corporate debt and equity in the ratio approved by the commission at the time of the financing order.

(ii) (I) Notwithstanding clause (i), following application by an electrical corporation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 850, the commission shall issue a financing order if the commission makes a determination that the conditions set forth in subclause (II) of clause (i) are satisfied. The
 issuance of recovery bonds pursuant to this clause is deemed to be consistent with the public interest. However, the commission may authorize recovery through fixed recovery charges of less than the full amount sought in the application if the commission determines that the recovery of the full amount of costs and expenses through a financing order pursuant to this subclause would not be cost effective for ratepayers.

(II) If the commission subsequently determines any costs or expenses included in the recovery bonds authorized by a financing order issued pursuant to subclause (i) are not just and reasonable pursuant to Section 451 or 451.1, the commission shall order the electrical corporation to credit ratepayers the disallowed costs and expenses plus any costs and expenses resulting from the inclusion of the disallowed costs and
 expenses in the recovery bonds with the credit provided over a period that matches the remaining duration of the bonds.
